hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Hajápolás: Hajápoló készletek; Hajszín; Hajszín-eltávolítók; Hajfestő-kiegészítők; Hajhullás elleni korrektorok; Hajhullás elleni kezelések; Tartós hajszerek és hajkiegyenesítők; Hajvágó olló; Hajpárolók és melegítősapkák; Hajformázó termékek; Hajformázóeszköz-kiegészítők; Hajformázó eszközök; Hajkezelések; Sampon és balzsam
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Saç Bakımı: Saç Bakım Setleri; Saç Boyaları; Saç Boyası Çıkarıcılar; Saç Boyama Aksesuarları; Saç Dökülmesi Kapatıcılar; Saç Dökülmesi Tedavileri; Perma ve Düzleştirme Makineleri; Kuaför Makasları; Saç Buhar Makineleri ve Isıtma Başlıkları; Saç Şekillendirme Ürünleri; Saç Şekillendirme Aleti Aksesuarları; Saç Şekillendirme Aletleri; Saç Bakımları; Şampuan ve Bakım Kremleri
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 모발 관리: 모발 관리 세트; 염색약; 염색 제거제; 머리 염색 부대용품; 흑채; 탈모 방지 용품; 파마/스트레이트 용품; 미용 가위; 헤어 스티머/전기 헤어캡; 헤어 스타일링 제품; 헤어 스타일링 도구 부대용품; 헤어 스타일링 도구; 헤어 트리트먼트; 샴푸/린스
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Pielęgnacja włosów: Zestawy do pielęgnacji włosów; Produkty do koloryzacji włosów; Ściągacze koloru; Akcesoria do farbowania włosów; Produkty maskujące przerzedzenia włosów; Preparaty przeciw wypadaniu włosów; Utrwalacze i środki do prostowania; Nożyczki do włosów; Podgrzewacze i czapki podgrzewające do włosów; Kosmetyki do stylizacji włosów; Akcesoria do stylizacji włosów; Narzędzia do stylizacji włosów; Pielęgnacja włosów; Szampony i odżywki
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Hair Care: Hair Care Kits; Hair Color; Hair Color Removers; Hair Coloring Accessories; Hair Loss Concealers; Hair Loss Treatments; Hair Permanents & Straighteners; Hair Shears; Hair Steamers & Heat Caps; Hair Styling Products; Hair Styling Tool Accessories; Hair Styling Tools; Hair Treatments; Shampoo & Conditioner
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado capilar: Kits de cuidado capilar; Coloración; Decolorantes para pelo teñido; Accesorios para teñir el cabello; Productos para ocultar la pérdida capilar; Tratamientos contra la caída del cabello; Rizadores y alisadores de pelo; Tijeras del pelo; Vaporizadores para el cabello y gorros térmicos; Espumas, lacas y geles de peinado; Accesorios para útiles de peluquería; Útiles de peluquería; Tratamientos capilares; Champú y acondicionador
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soin des cheveux: Kits de soin des cheveux; Coloration des cheveux; Décapants de coloration capillaire; Accessoires pour la coloration; Correcteurs de perte de cheveux; Soins antichute des cheveux; Solutions pour friser et défriser les cheveux; Ciseaux de coiffeur; Appareils vapeur et bonnets chauffants pour cheveux; Gels, mousses et sprays coiffants; Accessoires pour outils de coiffure; Outils de coiffure; Traitements capillaires; Shampooing et après-shampooing
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > ヘアケア用品: ヘアケア用品セット; ヘアカラー; ヘアカラーリムーバー; ヘアカラー用品; 薄毛用コンシーラー; 抜け毛対策グッズ; ヘアパーマ・ストレートパーマ; 散髪はさみ; ヘアスチーマー・ヒートキャップ; ヘアスタイリング剤; ヘアスタイリング道具関連用品; ヘアスタイリング道具; ヘアトリートメント; シャンプー・コンディショナー
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o vlasy: Súpravy starostlivosti o vlasy; Farba na vlasy; Odstraňovače farby na vlasy; Príslušenstvo na farbenie vlasov; Prípravky proti vypadávaniu vlasov; Kúry pri vypadávaní vlasov; Prípravky na trvalú a vyrovnanie vlasov; Kadernícke nožnice; Naparovače vlasov a čiapky na trvalú; Výrobky na úpravu vlasov; Príslušenstvo k nástrojom na úpravu vlasov; Nástroje na úpravu vlasov; Ošetrenia vlasov; Šampón a kondicionér
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Haarkosmetik: Haarpflege-Sets; Haarfärbemittel; Haar-Decoloration; Zubehör für Haarcolorationen; Haarverdichter; Mittel gegen Haarverlust; Mittel für Dauerwellen & Haarglättung, chemische Haarglättung; Haarscheren; Trockenhauben; Styling-Gel, Haarspray & Haarschaum; Zubehör für Haarstyling-Geräte; Haarstyling-Geräte; Haarpflegemittel; Shampoo & Spülung
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 头发护理: 头发护理套装; 染发剂; 染发除色剂; 染发用品; 脱发遮瑕膏; 脱发治疗/生发产品; 烫发/拉直/软化剂; 发剪; 烫发焗油帽/定型机; 发型设计产品; 头发造型工具配件; 头发造型工具; 头发护理用品; 洗发水与护发素
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o vlasy: Sady péče o vlasy; Barvení vlasů; Odstraňovače barvy na vlasy; Příslušenství k barvení vlasů; Přípravky na zhušťování vlasů; Přípravky proti vypadávání vlasů; Přípravky pro zvlnění a narovnání vlasů; Nůžky na vlasy; Napařovače vlasů a termické čepice; Gely, spreje a pěny; Nástroje pro vlasový styling – příslušenství; Nástroje pro vlasový styling; Přípravky na ošetření vlasů; Šampony a kondicionéry
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Nega las: Kompleti za nego las; Barve za lase; Odstranjevalci barve za lase; Dodatki za barvanje las; Sredstva za prekrivanje izpadanja las; Tretmaji za izpadanje las; Sredstva za trajno oblikovanje in ravnanje las; Škarje za lase; Parni aparati za lase in aparati za segrevanje las; Izdelki za oblikovanje las; Dodatki za orodje za oblikovanje las; Orodja za oblikovanje las; Tretmaji za lase; Šampon in balzam
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Hårvård: Hårvårdskit; Hårfärg; Hårfärgsborttagning; Tillbehör till hårfärgning; Medel för att dölja håravfall; Behandlingar mot håravfall; Permanentbehandlingar och rakpermanent; Frisörsaxar; Värmeplattor och ångprodukter för hår; Hårstylingsprodukter; Tillbehör till hårstylingsprodukter; Frisörredskap; Hårbehandlingar; Schampo och balsam
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Haarverzorging: Haarverzorgingssets; Haarkleurmiddelen; Haarverfverwijderaar; Accessoires voor haarkleuring; Maskeermiddelen bij haaruitval; Behandelingen voor haaruitval; Permanentproducten en straighteners; Kappersscharen; Haarstomers en droogkappen; Haargel, -lak en -mousse; Accessoires voor haarstylingsapparaten; Haarstylingsapparaten; Haar behandelingen; Shampoo en conditioner
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Грижа за косата: Комплекти за грижа за косата; Цвят за коса; Препарати за премахване на боя за коса; Аксесоари за боядисване на коса; Коректори за косопад; Лечение на косопад; Продукти за перманентно къдрене и изправяне на коса; Ножици за коса; Уреди за запарване на коса и термо шапки; Оформящи продукти за коса; Аксесоари за инструменти за оформяне на коса; Инструменти за оформяне на коса; Препарати за третиране на коса; Шампоан и балсам
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за волосами: Наборы средств для ухода за волосами; Краски для волос; Смывки краски для волос; Аксессуары для окрашивания волос; Средства для маскировки выпадения волос; Средства против выпадения волос; Средства для перманентной завивки и выпрямления волос; Ножницы для стрижки волос; Вапоризаторы и термошапки для волос; Средства для укладки волос; Аксессуары для инструментов для укладки волос; Инструменты для укладки волос; Лечебные средства для волос; Шампуни и кондиционеры
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados com os cabelos: Kits de cuidados com os cabelos; Tintura para cabelo; Removedores de tinta de cabelo; Acessórios para tintura de cabelo; Corretivos para perda de cabelo; Tratamentos para calvície; Alisadores de cabelo; Tesouras de cabelo; Toucas térmicas; Produtos de penteado; Acessórios para utensílios de penteado; Utensílios de penteado; Tratamentos capilares; Xampu e condicionador
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijirea părului: Seturi de îngrijire a părului; Vopsea de păr; Decapante pentru vopsea de păr; Accesorii pentru vopsirea părului; Corectoare pentru căderea părului; Tratamente pentru căderea părului; Soluții pentru bucle permanente și pentru îndreptarea părului; Foarfeci pentru păr; Aparate de aburi pentru păr și capișoane pentru tratamente la cald; Produse de coafat; Accesorii pentru instrumente de coafat; Instrumente de coafat; Tratamente pentru păr; Șampon și balsam
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado do cabelo: Kits de cuidado do cabelo; Coloração do cabelo; Removedores de coloração do cabelo; Acessórios de coloração do cabelo; Corretores de perda do cabelo; Tratamentos de perda de cabelo; Alisadores e permanentes de cabelo; Tesouras para o cabelo; Vaporizadores e toucas térmicas para o cabelo; Produtos para pentear o cabelo; Acessórios para pentear o cabelo; Equipamento para pentear o cabelo; Tratamentos capilares; Champô e condicionador
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Plaukų priežiūra: Plaukų priežiūros rinkiniai; Plaukų dažai; Plaukų dažų valikliai; Plaukų dažymo priedai; Plaukų slinkimą maskuojančios priemonės; Plaukų slinkimo gydymo priemonės; Plaukų garbanojimo ir tiesinimo priemonės; Plaukų žirklės; Plaukų garintuvai ir kaitinimo kepurės; Plaukų formavimo produktai; Plaukų formavimo įrankių priedai; Plaukų formavimo įrankiai; Plaukų priežiūros priemonės; Šampūnai ir kondicionieriai
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Hiustenhoito: Hiustenhoitosetit; Hiusväri; Hiusvärin poisto; Hiustenvärjäystarvikkeet; Hiustenlähdön peiteaineet; Hoitotuotteet hiustenlähtöön; Hiuspermanentit ja hiusten suoristus; Hiustenleikkuusakset; Hiusten höyry- ja lämpökuvut; Hiusten muotoilutuotteet; Hiusten muotoiluvälineiden lisätarvikkeet; Hiusten muotoiluvälineet; Hiuskäsittelyt; Shampoo ja hoitoaine
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega kose: Kompleti za njegu kose; Boja za kosu; Sredstva za uklanjanje boje za kosu; Pribor za bojanje kose; Sredstva za prikrivanje ispadanja kose; Tretmani protiv gubitka kose; Pribor za kovrčanje i pegle za kosu; Škare za kosu; Haube za kosu i toplinske kape; Proizvodi za oblikovanje kose; Dodaci za oblikovanje kose; Alati za oblikovanje kose; Tretmani za kosu; Šampon i regenerator
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Hårpleje: Hårplejesæt; Hårfarve; Fjernelse af hårfarve; Tilbehør til hårfarvning; Concealere mod hårtab; Behandling af hårtab; Hårpermanent og hårglatning; Hårsakse; Dampning af hår og vamehætter; Produkter til hårstyling; Tilbehør til hårstylingredskaber; Redskaber til hårstyling; Hårbehandlinger; Shampoo og balsam
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Hårpleie: Hårpleiesett; Hårfarge; Hårfargefjernere; Tilbehør for hårfarge; Produkter for skjuling av hårtap; Behandling mot hårtap; Hårpermanenter og rettemidler; Hårsakser; Hårsteamere og varmehetter; Hårstylingsprodukter; Tilbehør til hårstylingsprodukter; Hårstylingsverktøy; Hårbehandling; Sjampo og balsam
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Περιποίηση μαλλιών: Κιτ περιποίησης μαλλιών; Χρώμα μαλλιών; Προϊόντα αφαίρεσης της βαφής των μαλλιών; Αξεσουάρ βαφής μαλλιών; Καλυπτικά ατελειών (κονσίλερ) για κάλυψη της τριχόπτωσης; Θεραπείες τριχόπτωσης; Περμανάντ & ισιωτικά μαλλιών; Ψαλίδια μαλλιών; Στεγνωτήρες μαλλιών με ατμό & θερμαινόμενα σκουφάκια; Προϊόντα styling μαλλιών; Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων styling μαλλιών; Εργαλεία styling μαλλιών; Θεραπείες μαλλιών; Σαμπουάν & Conditioner
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc tóc: Bộ dụng cụ chăm sóc tóc; Thuốc nhuộm tóc; Tẩy màu tóc nhuộm; Phụ kiện nhuộm tóc; Sản phẩm che khuyết điểm tóc thưa/ hói; Chữa rụng tóc; Xoăn vĩnh viễn và duỗi; Kéo cắt tóc; Thiết bị hấp tóc & mũ hấp tóc; Sản phẩm tạo mẫu tóc; Phụ kiện dụng cụ làm tóc; Dụng cụ làm tóc; Sản phẩm trị liệu tóc; Dầu gội và xả
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลผม: ชุดผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลผม; ยาย้อมผม; ชุดลบสีผม; อุปกรณ์ทำสีผม; ผลิตภัณฑ์ปกปิดหนังศีรษะ; ผลิตภัณฑ์รักษาผมร่วง; ชุดทำผมเพอร์มาเนนท์และทำให้ผมตรง; กรรไกรตัดผม; หมวกอบไอน้ำและความร้อนสำหรับผม; ผลิตภัณฑ์แต่งทรงผม; อุปกรณ์จัดแต่งผม; เครื่องมือจัดแต่งผม; ทรีทเม้นท์บำรุงผม; ยาสระผมและครีมนวดผม
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cura dei capelli: Kit per la cura dei capelli; Tintura per capelli; Solventi per tinte per capelli; Accessori per la colorazione dei capelli da colorare; Correttori per la perdita di capelli; Trattamenti caduta capelli; Permanenti e prodotti raddrizzare capelli; Forbici per capelli; Caschi da parrucchiere; Fissatore in gel, spray e schiuma; Accessori per utensili per parrucchieri; Utensili per parrucchieri; Trattamenti per capelli; Shampoo e balsamo
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 頭髮保養: 頭髮保養組; 染髮品; 頭髮誤染去色劑; 染髮配件; 黑彩染髮噴霧; 健髮產品; 燙髮器; 剪髮刀; 蒸氣護髮機/護髮帽; 美髮產品; 髮型工具配件; 髮型工具; 頭髮護理產品; 洗髮精和潤髮乳